Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Chapter 11 Electronic Voting Systems

Cross references. —

As to voting machines generally, see §§

22-10-101

to

22-10-111

.

§ 22-11-101.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 1, defined terms for the chapter on electronic voting systems.

§ 22-11-102.
Use authorized; purchase or lease.

The board of county commissioners of each county may adopt for use, either experimentally or permanently, in any election in any or all polling places within the county, any electronic voting system authorized by law.

History.

Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-169.2; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2015 ch. 138, § 1, effective March 4, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

in (b), substituted “polling places” for “precincts.”

Laws 2015, ch. 138, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

Cross references. —

As to purchase or lease of voting machines, see §§

22-10-103

and

22-10-104

.

§ 22-11-103.
Capabilities required.

Every electronic voting system adopted for use in Wyoming shall:

Provide for voting in secrecy;

Permit each voter to vote at any election for all candidates and offices, and on any question, for which he is lawfully entitled to vote;

Permit voting either by paper ballot, by ballot card or by other mechanical, magnetic or electrical means by which a vote may be recorded;

Permit each voter, at presidential elections, by one (1) mark to vote for candidates of one (1) party for president, vice-president and presidential electors or to write in a name for president;

Provide for replacement of spoiled ballots;

Permit both absentee and write-in voting;

Provide automatic tabulating equipment which shall reject choices recorded on a ballot exceeding the number allowed, and at a primary election reject choices for candidates from a party other than the party for which a preference is expressed;

Be suitably designed to function safely, efficiently and accurately, when properly operated, in recording, tabulating and counting every vote cast;

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

Be certified by the secretary of state.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

The secretary of state may from time to time as necessary promulgate rules and regulations consistent with subsection (a) of this section and with all other requirements of this Election Code to govern the characteristics of electronic voting systems that may be used in Wyoming. The rules shall ensure the fairness and accuracy of elections. The rules may govern both the characteristics of the systems and the procedures to be followed in using the systems. The rules shall allow the county clerks to follow appropriate recommendations of the vendors of the systems for maintenance and management of the systems to the extent these recommendations are not inconsistent with this Election Code and with the rules. The rules shall be adopted following consultation with the county clerks.

History.

Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-169.3; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, §§ 2, 5; 2004, ch. 94, § 2; 2014 ch. 108, § 1, effective March 10, 2014.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(iii), added “or by other mechanical, magnetic or electrical means by which a vote may be recorded” at the end.

Laws 2004, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2004.

The 2014 amendment,

in (a)(iv), deleted “or punch.”

Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, §
8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2014.

§ 22-11-104.
Conduct of elections in which systems utilized.

All provisions of the Election Code governing the conduct of elections shall apply to elections in which electronic voting systems are used, except that the county clerk of any county in which an electronic voting system is used may make such modifications in ballot form as are necessary to facilitate the use of the electronic voting system and yet maintain the integrity of the election and the intent of the law.

The county clerk of each county using an electronic voting system shall:

Determine whether paper ballots, ballot cards or a combination of both will be used in each polling place;

Before the day of election deliver to each polling place using an electronic voting system:

A sufficient number of voting devices and ballots;

Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 2.

Other appropriate instructional materials or devices; and

All other materials required by law.

Before testing an electronic voting system for an election, notify the county chairman of each political party having a candidate on the ballot, stating the time and place of the test. The political party representatives and representatives of independent candidates may be present for the test, which shall be held at least two (2) weeks before the election. The test shall ascertain that the automatic tabulating equipment will accurately count the votes cast for all offices and all measures. The test shall be conducted by processing a preaudited group of paper ballots or ballot cards on which are recorded a predetermined number of valid votes for each candidate and on each measure and shall include for each office one (1) or more ballots which have votes in excess of the number allowed by law in order to test the ability of the automatic tabulating equipment to reject such votes. During the test a different number of valid votes shall be assigned to each candidate for an office, and for and against each measure. If any error is detected, the cause of it shall be ascertained and corrected and an errorless count shall be secured and certified to by the county clerk. On completion of the count, the programs, test materials and ballots shall be sealed and retained as provided for paper ballots;

Designate one (1) or more counting centers;

Provide adequate security for the delivery of all ballots to the designated counting center;

Provide that if any ballot is damaged or defective so that it cannot be properly counted by the automatic tabulating equipment, a true, duplicate copy shall be made by counting board members and substituted for the damaged or defective ballot. All duplicate ballots shall be clearly labeled “Duplicate” and shall bear a serial number which shall be recorded on the damaged or defective ballot. Damaged or defective ballots shall be delivered with the returns to the county clerk.

In addition to any other duties prescribed by law, election judges in polling places using an electronic voting system shall:

Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 2.

Provide adequate instruction in the use of the voting device to each voter before he enters the voting booth. Additional instruction may be provided as specified by law.

History.

Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-169.4; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 2010, ch. 3, § 2; 2014 ch. 108, §§ 1, 2, effective March 10, 2014; 2015 ch. 138, § 1, effective March 4, 2015.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (b)(iii), substituted “notify” for “mail a written notice to,” and deleted the second to the last sentence, which read: “The tabulating equipment shall pass the same test before and after the ballot count on an election day before the election returns are certified by the election judges.”

The 2014 amendment,

in (a), deleted “or ballot label” preceding “form as are necessary”; and repealed former (c)(i) which read: “Display facsimile diagrams of the voting device in the same manner as provided for voting machines.”

Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2014.

The 2015 amendment,

substituted “polling place” for “precinct” and made similar changes in (b) and (c).

Laws 2015, ch. 138, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

§ 22-11-105.
Spoiled ballots.

Any voter who spoils his paper ballot or ballot card may return it and secure a replacement. The word “Spoiled” shall be written across the face of the voided ballot, and it shall be placed in an envelope for spoiled ballots. Spoiled ballots shall be delivered with the returns to the county clerk.

History.

Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-169.5; 2013 ch. 28, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Cross references. —

For another provision concerning spoiled ballots, see §

22-13-107

.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, deleted “, but not more than twice” in the first sentence.

§ 22-11-106.
Procedure after voter marks paper ballot.

After marking the paper ballot, the voter shall place the ballot in the voting machine. If the votes are being counted at a central counting center as authorized by W.S. 22-14-114(b), the voter shall instead place the paper ballot in the ballot box.

History.

Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-169.6; 2020 ch. 100, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, rewrote the section, which read “After marking his paper ballot or ballot card, the voter shall place the ballot inside the ballot envelope and return it to the judge. The judge shall remove the stub and deposit the envelope with the ballot inside in the ballot box. The ballot stub shall be deposited in an envelope provided for that purpose. Ballot cards from which the ballot stub has been detached by anyone except an election judge shall not be deposited in the ballot box, but shall be marked ‘Spoiled’ and placed in the spoiled ballot envelope.”

§ 22-11-107.
Failure of automatic tabulating equipment.

If the automatic tabulating equipment fails during the ballot count, the counting board shall use an alternate method of counting the ballots.

History.

Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-169.7.

§ 22-11-108.
Retabulation.

A retabulation may be performed at the discretion of the county clerk. If the retabulation indicates a different count, the result of the last retabulation shall be the official result unless a recount is conducted. If the difference in the retabulations affects the result of any race or ballot proposition, a recount under W.S. 22-16-109(a) shall be conducted.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 18, § 1.

§ 22-11-109.
Post election audit.

The county clerk shall conduct a random audit of ballots by processing the preaudited group of test ballots as described in W.S. 22-11-104(b)(iii) on five percent (5%) of the automated tabulating equipment for that county, but on not less than one (1) machine, within thirty (30) days of any election in which the tabulating equipment was used.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 3, § 1.

Effective date. —

Laws 2010, ch. 3, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.